Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-909
Solar agreement, defined.

Solar agreement shall mean a right,
whether or not stated in the form of a restriction, easement, covenant, or
condition, in any deed, will, or other instrument executed by any person for
the purpose of insuring adequate access of a solar energy system to solar
energy.

Laws 1979, LB 353, § 9;

Laws 2012, LB828, § 5.